Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6108
State Treasurer; powers and duties.

(1) The State Treasurer shall:

(a) Operate an interior designer registry listing registered interior designers;

(b) Credit fees collected under the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act to the State Treasurer Administrative Fund; and

(c) Prescribe individually identifiable seals to be used by registered interior designers pursuant to section 71-6106.

(2) The State Treasurer may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 21.